District of Columbia statutes.
4-1305.09

Penalties for violation of confidentiality.

(a)

An individual who discloses confidential information in violation of § 4-1305.08 shall be guilty of a criminal offense and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000 or a term of incarceration of not more than 180 days, or both.

(b)

An individual who fails to disclose all of the residences and addresses required by § 4-1305.03(a)(3) shall be guilty of a criminal offense and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000, a term of imprisonment of not more than 180 days, or both.

(c)

Violations of this section shall be prosecuted by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia, or his or her designee, in the name of the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title V, § 509, formerly § 329
as added June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 201(f), 47 DCR 2850
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-341, § 2(s), 52 DCR 2315
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 22(a)(10), 53 DCR 6794

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-341 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsecs. (b) and (c).
D.C. Law 16-191 renumbered the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 4-1305.01.